District of Columbia statutes.
31-1810

Penalties and liabilities.

(a)

If the Mayor determines that the reinsurer intermediary or any other person has not materially complied with this chapter, or any regulation or order promulgated thereunder, after notice and opportunity to be heard, the Mayor may order:

(1)

For each separate violation, a penalty in an amount not exceeding $10,000;

(2)

Revocation or suspension of the producer’s license; and

(3)

If it was found that because of material noncompliance the insurer has suffered any loss or damage, the Commissioner may maintain a civil action brought by or on behalf of the insurer and its policyholders and creditors for recovery of compensatory damages for the benefit of the insurer and its policyholders and creditors, or other appropriate relief.

(b)

If an order of rehabilitation or liquidation of the insurer has been entered pursuant to Chapter 13 of this title, and the receiver appointed under that order determines that the reinsurance intermediary or any other person has not materially complied with this chapter, or any regulation or order promulgated thereunder, and the insurer suffered any loss or damage, the receiver may maintain a civil action for recovery of damages or other appropriate sanctions for the benefit of the insurer.

(c)

Nothing contained in this section shall affect the right of the Mayor to impose any other penalties provided in District insurance law.

(d)

Nothing contained in this chapter is intended to or shall in any manner limit or restrict the rights of policyholders, claimants, creditors, or other third parties or confer any rights to those persons.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-47, § 11, 40 DCR 6093
Apr. 26, 1994, D.C. Law 10-103, § 6(b), 41 DCR 1005
Feb. 27, 1996, D.C. Law 11-90, §§ 4(b), 4(c), 42 DCR 7155
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(bb), 44 DCR 1730
1981 Ed., § 35-3110.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 6(b) of Insurance Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-76, March 17, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 1626).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of Insurance Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-36, September 8, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 5305).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 5(b) and (c) of the Insurance Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-48, May 15, 1995, 42 DCR 2544) and § 4(b) and (c) of the Insurance Omnibus Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-97, July 19, 1995, 42 DCR 3844).